Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.070

Election method—Notice of election.

Notice of an annexation election shall particularly describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, as the same may have been modified by the boundary review board or the county annexation review board, state the objects of the election as prayed in the petition or as stated in the resolution, and require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain the words "For Annexation" or "Against Annexation" or words equivalent thereto, or contain the words "For Annexation and Adoption of Proposed Zoning Regulation", and "Against Annexation and Adoption of Proposed Zoning Regulation", or words equivalent thereto in case the simultaneous adoption of a proposed zoning regulation is proposed, and in case the assumption of all or a portion of indebtedness is proposed, shall contain an appropriate, separate proposition for or against the portion of indebtedness that the city requires to be assumed. The notice shall be posted for at least two weeks prior to the date of election in four public places within the area proposed to be annexed and published at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of election in a newspaper of general circulation within the limits of the territory proposed to be annexed. Such notice shall be in addition to the notice required by general election law.

[ 1994 c 223 s 38; 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 124: See note following RCW 35A.14.015.